Rhode Island, session 2025, SB680.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-4.6 of the General Laws entitled "Consent to Medical and
Surgical Care" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-4.6-2. Consent to hospice care.
(a) A patient, recommended for hospice services shall have the right to have a caregiver,
as defined in § 23-17.27-1, present when hospice services are explained to the patient prior to the
patient consenting to hospice services.
(b) If practical, the patient's caregiver shall be present whenever any medical decisions are
discussed by the hospice healthcare team with the patient.
(c) Prior to a patient consenting to hospice services, the patient's caregiver shall be provided
with all information regarding the patient's medication and treatment and how entering hospice is
anticipated to effect the prescribed medication and treatment.
(d) A hospice patient shall have access to visiting nurse care at home and not be excluded
from those services because of income or age limitations.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001579/SUB A
========